South Dakota, session 2026, SB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $2,500,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Education, for the provision of grants to sparse school districts, as defined in § 13-13-78, for
the purposes provided in section 3 of this Act.
Section 2. The Department of Education shall provide a grant directly to each sparse school
district, as defined in § 13-13-78. Each sparse school district must be granted a pro rata share
of the moneys appropriated in section 1 of this Act, based on the district's 2026 fall
enrollment, as determined under § 13-13-10.1.
Section 3. A sparse school district shall use the moneys granted to make facility
improvements, or purchase educational technology or other instructional materials and
equipment.
Section 4. The secretary of the Department of Education shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 5. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated by June
30, 2027, shall revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 6. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.